Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-106
Contempt; imprisonment; maximum sentence.

Imprisonment for contempt of the Legislature shall not be for more than six hours, and shall be in the jail of the county in which the Legislature may be sitting.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 8, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 3747;

C.S.1922, § 3140;

C.S.1929, § 50-106;

R.S.1943, § 50-106.